tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Giriş Aygıtları > Oyun Kumandaları: Arcade Çubukları; Dans Matları; Uçuş Simülatörü Kontrolleri; Oyun Yarış Vites Kolları; Oyuncak Yarış Arabası; Oyun Kolları; Oyun Padleri; Oyun Kolu Kumandaları; Müzik Enstrümanı Oyun Kumandaları; Sim Yarış Düğme Kutuları; Sanal Gerçeklik Hareket Kontrolleri
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Входни устройства > Контролери за игри: Аркадни джойстици; Танцови подложки; Контролери за авиосимулатор; Скоростни лостове за състезателна игра; Волани за игра; Дистанционни за игри; Подложки за игри; Джойстици; Контролери за игра – музикални инструменти; Бутонни кутии за симулатор на състезателно шофиране; Контролери за движение за виртуална реалност
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Invoerapparaten > Gamecontrollers: Arcade sticks; Dansmatten; Flight simulator controllers; Game raceschakelaars; racestuur games; Afstandsbedieningen voor gaming; Gamepads; Joysticks; Gamecontroller muziekinstrument; Sim racing button boxes; Virtual reality motion controllers
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Vstupné zariadenia > Herné ovládače: Arkádové páky; Tanečné podložky; Ovládače leteckých simulátorov; Radiacej páky pre hry; Hra Racing Wheels; Herné ovládače; Herné podložky; Joystickové ovládače; Herné ovládače na hudobné nástroje; Sim racing tlačidlové boxy; Ovládače pohybu virtuálnej reality
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Naprave za vnos podatkov > Krmilniki za igre: Arkadne krmilne palice; Plesne podloge; Krmilniki za letalske simulatorje; Menjalniki za dirkalne igre; Igralni volani; Igralni daljinski upravljalniki; Igralni ploščki; Krmilniki za igralne palice; Glasbeni igralni pripomočki; Gumbne plošče za dirkalne simulatorje; Krmilniki gibanja za navidezno resničnost
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Dispositivi di input > Controller per giochi: Stick arcade; Tappeti da ballo; Controller del simulatore di volo; Cambi da corsa del gioco; Volanti da gioco; Telecomandi da gioco; Tappetini da gaming; Controller joystick; Controller per giochi di musica; Scatole pulsanti per corse simulate; Controller di movimento realtà virtuale
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Périphériques de saisie > Manettes de jeu: Manettes d’arcade; Tapis de danse; Contrôleurs de simulateur de vol; Leviers de vitesses pour jeux de course; Volants pour jeux de course; Télécommandes de jeu; Tapis de jeu; Joysticks; Fonctions de jeu pour instruments de musique; Boîtiers de boutons pour simulation de course; Contrôleurs de mouvement de réalité virtuelle
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Inndataenheter > Spillkontrollere: Spillemaskin-spaker; Dansematter; Flysimulator-kontrollere; Racinggirspaker til spill; Spillratt; Spillfjernkontroller; Spillpads; Joystickkontrollere; Spillkontrollere for musikkinstrumenter; Knappebokser til racingsimulator; Bevegelsesskontrollere for virtuell virkelighet
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Συσκευές εισόδου > Χειριστήρια παιχνιδιών: Arcade sticks; Χαλιά χορού; Ελεγκτές προσομοίωσης πτήσης; Μοχλοί ταχυτήτων για αγωνιστικά παιχνίδια; Τιμόνια για αγώνες σε παιχνίδια; Τηλεχειριστήρια παιχνιδιών; Βάσεις για παιχνίδια; Χειριστήρια Joystick; Χειριστήρια μουσικών οργάνων για παιχνίδια; Button boxes για προσομοιώσεις αγώνων ταχύτητας; Ελεγκτές κίνησης εικονικής πραγματικότητας
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Inmatningsenheter > Spelkontroller: Arkadstycken; Dansmattor; Flygsimulatorkontroller; Spelracingväxlar; Tävlingsrattar för spel; Spelfjärrkontroller; Spelmattor; Joysticks; Spelkontroller för musikinstrument; Sim-racingknapplådor; VR-rörelsekontroller
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 입력 장치 > 게임 컨트롤러: 아케이드 스틱; 댄스 매트; 플라이트 시뮬레이터 컨트롤러; 게임 레이싱 시프터; 게임용 레이싱 휠; 게임용 리모컨; 게이밍 패드; 조이스틱 컨트롤러; 악기 게임 컨트롤러; 심 레이싱 버튼 박스; 가상 현실 모션 컨트롤러
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Vstupní zařízení > Herní ovladače: Arkádové páky; Taneční podložky; Ovladače pro letecké simulátory; Řadicí páky pro závodní hry; Závodní herní volanty; Herní dálkové ovladače; Herní podložky; Pákové ovladače (joysticky); Herní ovladače (hudební nástroje); Tlačítkové boxy pro sim racing; Pohybové ovladače pro virtuální realitu
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Dispozitive de intrare > Controlere pentru jocuri: Stickuri arcade; Covorașe de dans; Controlere pentru simulatoare de zbor; Schimbătoare de viteze pentru curse; Volane pentru jocuri; Telecomenzi pentru jocuri; Paduri pentru jocuri; Joystickuri; Controlere pentru jocuri cu instrumente muzicale; Cutii cu butoane pentru simulatoare de curse; Controlere de mișcare pentru realitate virtuală
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Eingabegeräte > Gamecontroller: Arcade-Sticks; Tanzmatten; Flugsimulator-Controller; Renn-Schaltknüppel; Lenkräder für Racing Games; Spielefernbedienungen; Gaming Pads; Joystick-Controller; Musikinstrumente-Gamecontroller; Sim-Racing-Button-Boxen; Virtual-Reality-Bewegungscontroller
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Dispositivos de entrada > Controladores de jogo: Joysticks de arcade; Tapetes de dança; Controladores de simulador de voo; Caixas de velocidades para jogos de corrida; Volantes de jogos de corrida; Controlos remotos de jogos; Consolas de jogos; Controladores de joystick; Controladores de jogo de instrumentos musicais; Caixas de botões para simulação de corrida; Controladores de movimento de realidade virtual
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Inputenheder > Spilcontrollere: Arkademærker; Dansemåtter; Flysimulator-controllere; Gearskifter til racerspil; Gaming-rat; Gaming-controllere; Gamingmåtter; Joysticks; Controllere til spil med musikinstrumenter; Knapboks til racersimulatorer; Motion controllers til virtual reality
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thiết bị đầu vào > Bộ điều khiển chơi game: Gậy arcade; Thảm nhảy; Bộ điều khiển mô phỏng bay; Bộ chuyển đổi gaming racing; Vô lăng chơi game; Tay cầm chơi game; Bàn di chuột chơi game; Tay cầm có cần điều khiển; Bộ điều khiển chơi game kiểu nhạc cụ; Hộp nút sim racing; Bộ điều khiển chuyển động thực tế ảo
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Syöttölaitteet > Peliohjaimet: Arcade-ohjaussauva; Tanssimatto; Lentosimulaattoriohjain; Pelin kilpa-ajon vaihdevipu; Rattiohjaimet; Kauko-ohjaimet pelaamiseen; Pelihiirimatot; Joystick-ohjaimet; Soitinohjaimet; Kilpa-ajosimulaattorin painikkeet; Virtuaalitodellisuuden liiketunnistinohjaimet
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Dispositivos de entrada > Controladores de juegos: Palancas arcade; Tapetes de danza; Controles de simulador de vuelo; Cambios de marcha para carreras de juego; Volantes para juegos de carreras; Controles remotos para juegos; Almohadillas para juegos; Mandos de joystick; Controles de juegos de instrumentos musicales; Cajas de botones para simulador de carreras; Controladores de movimiento de realidad virtual
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อุปกรณ์ป้อนข้อมูล > จอยเกม: จอยสติ๊กอาร์เคด; แผ่นเต้น; คอนโทรลเลอร์จำลองการบิน; เกียร์เกมแข่งรถ; พวงมาลัยสำหรับเล่นเกมแข่งรถ; อุปกรณ์ควบคุมเกมแบบไร้สาย; แผ่นรองเมาส์สำหรับเล่นเกม; จอยสติก; อุปกรณ์ควบคุมเกมแบบเครื่องดนตรี; กล่องปุ่มจำลองการแข่งรถ; คอนโทรลเลอร์ตรวจจับการเคลื่อนไหวความจริงเสมือน
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Устройства ввода > Игровые контроллеры: Аркадные джойстики; Танцевальные коврики; Контроллеры для авиасимуляторов; Игровые коробки передач для гонок; Игровые рули; Пульты управления для игр; Геймпады; Джойстики; Игровые контроллеры для имитации музыкальных инструментов; Кнопочные панели для симуляторов гонок; Контроллеры движения для виртуальной реальности
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Dispositivos de entrada > Controladores de jogos: Joysticks arcade; Tapetes de dança; Controladores de simulador de voo; Alavancas de câmbio para jogos de corrida; Volante para jogos; Controle para jogos; Mouse pad para jogos; Controles e joysticks; Acessórios para jogos musicais; Button boxes para corrida de simulação; Controladores de movimento para realidade virtual
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 输入设备 > 游戏手柄: 街机摇杆; 跳舞毯; 飞行模拟器控制器; 赛车换挡器; 赛车方向盘; 游戏遥控器; 游戏垫; 摇杆手柄; 乐器摇杆手柄; 模拟赛车按钮盒; 虚拟现实动作控制器
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Input Devices > Game Controllers: Arcade Sticks; Dance Mats; Flight Simulator Controllers; Game Racing Shifters; Game Racing Wheels; Game Remotes; Gaming Pads; Joystick Controllers; Musical Instrument Game Controllers; Sim Racing Button Boxes; Virtual Reality Motion Controllers
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Beviteli eszközök > Játékvezérlők: Arcade játékvezérlők; Táncszőnyegek; Repülőgépszimulátor-vezérlők; Játékversenyzős váltók; Játék-versenykormányok; Játéktávirányítók; Játékpadok; Joystick-vezérlők; Hangszeres játékvezérlők; Versenyszimulátor-vezérlőpanelek; VR-mozgásérzékelő vezérlők
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Urządzenia wejściowe > Kontrolery do gier: Joysticki typu arcade; Maty taneczne; Kontrolery symulatora lotu; Skiby gry wyścigowej; Gra Racing Wheels; Piloty do gier; Podkładki gamingowe; Joysticki, kontrolery; Instrumenty muzyczne - kontrolery gier; Panele przycisków do simracingu; Kontrolery ruchowe VR
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 輸入裝置 > 遊戲控制器: 街機搖桿; 跳舞墊; 飛行模擬控制器; 賽車遊戲排檔桿; 遊戲方向盤; 遊戲遙控器; 遊戲手把; 操控搖桿; 樂器遊戲操控搖桿; 模擬賽車按鈕盒; 虛擬實境動作控制器
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Įvesties įrenginiai > Žaidimų valdikliai: Arkadinės valdymo lazdos; Šokių kilimėliai; Skrydžio simuliatoriaus valdikliai; Lenktyninių žaidimų pavarų perjungikliai; Žaidimų vairai; Žaidimų nuotolinio valdymo pultai; Žaidimų valdiklių moduliai; Vairasvirtės valdikliai; Muzikos instrumentų žaidimų valdikliai; Simuliacinių lenktynių mygtukų skydeliai; Virtualiosios realybės judesio valdikliai
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Ulazni uređaji > Igraći upravljači: Arkadne palice; Plesne prostirke; Kontroleri za simulator letenja; Mjenjači za automobilističke igre; Trkaći volani za videoigrice; Daljinski upravljači za igre; Podloge za igranje; Joystick upravljači; Igraći upravljači za glazbene instrumente; Kutije s gumbima za simulaciju utrka; Kontroleri pokreta za virtualnu stvarnost
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > 入力デバイス > ゲームコントローラー: アーケードスティック; ダンスマット; フライトシミュレーターコントローラー; レーシングシフター; ゲームレーシングホイール; ゲーム用リモコン; ゲーム用パッド; ジョイスティックコントローラー; 楽器ゲームコントローラー; シムレーシングボタンボックス; VRモーションコントローラー